Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
POLICY AND VALUES
SECTION 1. It is the intent of the  Legislative Assembly in enacting sections 2 to 4 of this
2024 Act that the rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human
Services and actions taken by the authority and  the department to administer sections 2 to
4 of this 2024 Act be guided by the following policy and values, that:
(1) Each child and youth is an individual with unique strengths and needs and  must be
met with developmentally,  culturally and linguistically appropriate and individually respon-
sive services that recognize the individual as a whole person;
(2) Children, youth and their families are the experts on their lives  and needs and must
be meaningfully included in all decisions about their individual  services and supports and be
meaningfully included in policy making and service design;
(3) All children and youth, regardless of the  type or severity of diagnoses or the disability
they experience, must be supported to live,  work, play and attend school in integrated com-
munity settings and  must be supported to safely and successfully remain in their family
homes and local schools to the maximum extent possible;
(4) Agencies and community partners must proactively recognize and build upon the
unique strengths and potential of each child, youth and family;
(5) State  agencies must prioritize child, youth and family-centered supports toward pre-
vention and recovery;
(6) Children and youth  must not be restricted to a single-service setting or delivery sys-
tem and must be provided with access to all services for which the children or youth are
eligible regardless of their disability type or family situation;
(7) Children, youth and their families must be supported to  access the appropriate com-
prehensive home and community-based services and supports that prevent crises from hap-
pening or from reoccurring and that provide support and stabilization in the event of a crisis;
(8) State agencies that serve children, youth and their families  must prioritize collab-
oration and information-sharing to support children and youth receiving multi-system  sup-
ports through culturally and linguistically appropriate, disability-affirming  and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 1
family-focused supports to remain in the community and avoid physical  or mental health
crises, hospitalizations or out-of-home placements;
(9) State agencies that serve children,  youth and their families and community partners
of the state agencies must collaborate  to provide wraparound, child and youth-centered and
trauma-responsive supports to children, youth  and their families, including foster families,
as children and youth transfer between placement settings across  the continuum of services;
and
(10) The state  must access, to the maximum extent possible, all federal funds available
to support children and youth with complex needs, at home, in substitute  care, in the com-
munity and at school.
ENTITLEMENT UNDER THE K PLAN
SECTION 2. Consistent with any assurances made  by the Oregon Health Authority to the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services under the provisions of the state plan for med-
ical assistance relating to the Community First Choice Option under 42  U.S.C. 1396n(k), the
authority shall ensure that  all children and youth who are eligible for medical assistance,
including children who are in the custody of the Department of Human Services, who  meet
the criteria for an institutional level of  care have access to the home and community-based
services to which they are entitled under the state plan for medical assistance.
COORDINATION AND CROSS-AGENCY COLLABORATION
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means an individual under 18 years of age.
(b) “Medicaid/CHIP Operations Coordination Steering Committee” means the  committee
comprised of executive level staff  and subject matter experts that is required by the terms
of the state’s Home and Community-Based Services  waiver, under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c), to
meet at least quarterly to coordinate  all mutual policy issues related to the operation and
administration of  the state’s medical assistance programs, including state plan amendments,
waiver requests, rules, procedures and interpretive guidance.
(c) “Multi-system involved child or youth” means a child or  youth who is concurrently
involved in two or more of the child welfare, mental  health, juvenile justice, special educa-
tion, developmental disability services or aging  and persons with disabilities services sys-
tems.
(d) “Serious emotional disturbance” means a mental, behavioral or  emotional disorder,
regardless of origin, that:
(A) Is of sufficient duration to be diagnosed by a qualified licensed health provider uti-
lizing the diagnostic criteria specified  in the fifth edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; and
(B) Has resulted  in a functional impairment that substantially interferes with or limits
the individual’s role or functioning in family, school or community activities.
(e) “Wraparound team” means a group of people chosen  by a child or youth and con-
nected to the child or youth through natural, community and formal  support systems, who
develop and implement the  child or youth and the family’s plan to address unmet needs and
work toward the child or youth and family’s vision and team mission.
(f) “Youth” means an individual 18 through 20 years of age.
(2) In  consultation with the Medicaid/CHIP Operations Coordination Steering Committee,
the Department of  Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules nec-
essary to  facilitate cross-agency coordination that supports each multi-system involved child
or youth who  is eligible for services and supports funded through the Community First
Choice Option under 42 U.S.C.  1396n(k) or the state plan for medical assistance to have all
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 2
of the assessed needs of the child or  youth fully met, including through the use of available
natural and community supports, while  avoiding the duplication of services. At a minimum,
the rules must:
(a) Clarify the roles of wraparound teams, community developmental  disabilities pro-
grams, children’s intensive in-home services providers, schools, child  welfare programs and
other relevant entities in the determination of  a multi-system involved child or youth’s level
of care  needs and an assessment of the functional and service coordination needs of each
child or youth;
(b) Streamline the application and eligibility  determination process by allowing each
multi-system involved child or youth’s assessment, application and service  plan to be shared
across all relevant systems to the maximum extent permitted by state and federal law;
(c) Ensure that each child  or youth who experiences intellectual or developmental disa-
bilities in  addition to mental illness or a substance use disorder is provided simultaneous
access to services and support offered by each  agency serving the child or youth without
delay;
(d) Prohibit any agency, program or provider  from denying mental or behavioral health
services to a child or youth because the  child or youth has an intellectual or developmental
disability or a substance use disorder, including alcohol use disorder,  in addition to the child
or youth’s mental illness or serious emotional disturbance;
(e) Ensure  coordination between public agencies that serve multi-system involved chil-
dren or youth:
(A) To support each multi-system involved child or youth to  enable the child or youth to
remain in the community and avoid health crises, hospitalizations or out-of-home  place-
ments;
(B) With  a focus of the coordination being on prevention, recovery and support, recog-
nizing the unique strengths and potential of each multi-system involved child or youth; and
(f) Support children or youth and their families to  access the appropriate comprehensive
home and community-based services and supports that prevent crises from  happening or
reoccurring and that provide support and stabilization in the event of a crisis.
(3) In  adopting rules under this section, the department and the authority shall appoint
a rules advisory committee that includes youth who are  or who were multi-system involved
children or youth, and their families.
INVESTIGATION AND REPORT ON K PLAN
SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means an individual under 18 years of age.
(b) “Mental health resource  home” means a foster home specifically designed for children
with mental illness, including  those who have been removed from their families not due to
abuse or neglect but to provide specialized foster care to meet their needs.
(c) “Multi-system  involved children or youth” means children or youth who are concur-
rently involved in two or more of the child welfare, mental health, juvenile  justice, special
education, developmental disability services or aging  and persons with disabilities services
systems.
(d) “Serious emotional disturbance” has the meaning given  that term in section 3 of this
2024 Act.
(e) “Treatment foster care” means a foster care setting  providing enhanced services as
an alternative  to institutional or residential care and group home placements for children
and youth with serious emotional disturbances or severe behavioral disorders.
(f) “Wraparound team”  means a group of people chosen by a child or youth and con-
nected to the child or youth through natural, community and formal support systems who
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 3
develop and implement the child or youth and the family’s plan to address  unmet needs and
work toward the child or youth and family’s vision and team mission.
(g) “Youth” means an individual 18 through 20 years of age.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, in  collaboration with the Department of Human Ser-
vices and with families and youth with lived experience, shall investigate the services and
supports provided to  individuals under the age of 21 years and funded through the Commu-
nity First  Choice Option under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(k) that are provided to avoid a placement of
a child or youth in each of the following types of institutions:
(a) A hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015;
(b) A nursing home;
(c) An intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual  disabilities or persons
with related conditions certified under 42 C.F.R. part 483; or
(d) An inpatient facility  providing psychiatric treatment to individuals under the age of
21 years.
(3) No later than October 1, 2024, the authority shall provide a preliminary report of the
authority’s findings in its investigation under subsection (2) of this section to the interim
committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to health care and to human services. The
report must include, at a minimum:
(a) The following information disaggregated  by the each type of institutional care listed
in subsection (2)  of this section that are avoided by providing the services and supports de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section:
(A) The number of individuals under the age of 21 years who are receiving services and
supports funded by the Community First Choice Option;
(B) How the authority informs the following individuals, facilities and organizations about
how to access the services and supports:
(i) Individuals who are eligible for the services and supports and their parents, guardians
or caretakers;
(ii) The child welfare programs  within the Department of Human Services that have
children in protective custody;
(iii) Pediatricians;
(iv) Children’s mental health programs;
(v) Wraparound teams;
(vi) Schools; and
(vii) Hospitals;
(C) The types of home and community-based settings in which the individuals receive  the
services and supports;
(D) The number of individuals who received relief care  utilizing funding available through
the Community First Choice Option;
(E) The number of individuals receiving services and supports who  are served by child
welfare programs within the department;
(F) The total amount of federal funds generated to serve individuals  under the age of 21
years through the Community First Choice Option in each of the prior three fiscal years;
(G) An  estimate of the total amount of unmatched General Fund expenditures that could
receive federal matching funds  through the Community First Choice Option and that were
spent to meet the needs  of individuals under the age of 21 years who are in the child welfare
system;  and
(H) An estimate of the number of children  disrupted from their family homes each year
due to the children’s unmet disability or mental health related needs; and
(b) Recommendations:
(A) About opportunities to use the Community First  Choice Option to expand and en-
hance the services that will support individuals under the age of  21 years who experience
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 4
serious emotional disturbances or mental illness to live  successfully in their family homes
and avoid crises;
(B) About opportunities to maximize federal matching funds to support services  for in-
dividuals under the age of 21 years who experience substance use disorders;
(C) For how federal matching funds provided through the Community First Choice Option
can be used to expand and enhance funding for and access to  supports to foster parents
serving children with serious emotional disturbances,  mental illness or substance use disor-
ders, including but not limited to relief care, training and in-home attendant care services;
(D) About whether and how provisions of Medicaid and Medicaid funding  streams may
be utilized to create mental health  resource homes, specialized homes for up to two children
with behavioral health needs or treatment foster care that is accessible to the  children
served by child welfare  programs in the Department of Human Services and to children,
youth and young adults without requiring  the children, youth or young adults to first access
the child welfare system or the juvenile justice system;
(E) About how federal  matching funds through the Community First Choice Option can
be used to support children and youth with serious emotional disturbances, mental illness
or substance use disorders and to provide  services necessary for a successful transition from
institutional placement or other restrictive placement to a family home, a foster  home or
another less restrictive environment;
(F) For how multi-system involved children or youth who  are eligible for services and
supports under the Community First Choice  Option or the state plan for medical assistance
have their assessed needs fully met  while avoiding duplication of services and supports, in-
cluding by using available natural and community supports;
(G) For any statutory changes or changes to the authority’s legislatively adopted  budget
that are necessary to implement recommendations that will  maximize available funds
through the Community First Choice Option  and support children and youth to avoid crises
and remain in the least restrictive environment; and
(H) About implementing a policy to disregard  parental income when determining medical
assistance eligibility for  children and youth with serious emotional disturbances, including
the following information about the effects of the policy:
(i) The estimated size of the population that is not currently eligible for  medical assist-
ance but that would be eligible for medical assistance due to such a policy;
(ii) The estimated cost to serve the entire eligible population;
(iii) Whether the number of  children with serious emotional disturbances who are eligible
to have their parents’ income disregarded should be capped, and if so, at what number;
(iv) Criteria to utilize if the number of children  described in sub-subparagraph (iii) of this
subparagraph was capped; and
(v) What impact the disregard of parental income may have  on preventing the temporary
lodging of children in the custody of the Department of Human  Services, accessing Medicaid
funding for school-based care for students with  high needs and boarding children in emer-
gency rooms due to the lack of available placements.
(4) No later than March 1, 2025, the  authority shall provide to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to health care and to human services a report with up-
dated information and recommendations described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department or the authority shall implement  without delay any recommendations
that can be implemented  without legislative action or budgetary authority or that are oth-
erwise mandated under state or federal law.
ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority, a community mental health program, a
licensed medical provider or other certified or licensed practitioner, an education provider
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 5
or a coordinated care organization may not deny any individual under the age of  21 years
access to mental health assessment,  treatment or services on the basis that the individual
also has an intellectual or developmental disability.
(2) The authority, the Department  of Human Services, the Department of Education, the
Oregon Medical Board and other  health licensing agencies that license or certify mental or
behavioral health providers shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(3)(a) As used in this section, “education provider” means:
(A) A school district, as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) The Oregon School for the Deaf;
(C) An educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program;
(D) A public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005;
(E) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003;
(F) An approved recovery school, as defined in ORS 336.680; or
(G) Any state-operated program that provides educational services to students.
(b) “Education provider” does not include:
(A) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(B) The Department of Corrections; or
(C) The Department of Education, except when functioning as an  education provider on
behalf of the Oregon School for the Deaf.
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall review, and  amend as needed, current
administrative rules and contracts to ensure that individuals receiving  medical assistance
who are under 21 years of age have timely access to the services described in subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) The services described in subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The medically necessary or medically appropriate  medical assistance services neces-
sary to:
(A) Prevent an individual who is under 21 years of age from needing an  out-of-home
placement, prevent the disruption of a current  placement or prevent the need for the indi-
vidual to move to a placement providing a higher level of care;
(B) Ensure the continuity of care for individuals under 21 years of  age who are in out-
of-home placements and move from one  coordinated care organization to another coordi-
nated care organization or are enrolled for the  first time in a coordinated care organization;
and
(C) Ensure, to individuals described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  undisrupted
access to prescription medication, medical equipment and supplies;
(b) Assessments or evaluations necessary  to establish eligibility for services and supports
provided in the medical assistance program or by the Department of Education;
(c) Diabetic supplies; and
(d) Counseling, therapy  or mental health or substance use disorder treatment with a
provider with whom a child or youth has an established relationship.
FEDERAL FUNDS FOR SCHOOL-BASED SERVICES
SECTION 8.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  and the Department of Education shall
develop strategies and recommendations to  leverage federal Medicaid or Children’s Health
Insurance Program funds to support the inclusion,  academic success and well-being of all
Oregon students under 21 years of age who are eligible for medical assistance, including
students with severe emotional disturbances and  students who need school-based nursing
services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 6
(2) No later than October 1,  2024, the authority and the department shall report to the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245, on the strategies and recom-
mendations developed. The report must include, at a minimum:
(a) Strategies to simplify medical assistance billing for school districts;
(b) Recommendations for  any needed investments in infrastructure, including staff and
technology, to ensure low-barrier access to services in the medical assistance  program for
eligible students; and
(c) Specific recommendations related to leveraging federal funds to  increase access to
school-based services including, but not limited to:
(A) Nursing services for medically fragile and medically involved students;
(B) Access to school-based mental  health care, including screening, assessment, coun-
seling, treatment and therapy from licensed providers;
(C) Access to school-based direct services  in speech, physical and occupational therapy,
nutrition, respiratory therapy, functional behavioral assessment and behavior support  ser-
vices;
(D) Personal care and noneducational attendant care services at school to improve access
to inclusive settings for students with high needs; and
(E) Enhanced specialized transportation services.
(3) As used in this section, “medical assistance” has the meaning given  that term in ORS
414.025.
DETERMINATION OF YOUTH’S FITNESS TO PROCEED
SECTION 9.
 ORS 419C.380 is amended to read:
419C.380. (1) An evaluation ordered under ORS 419C.378 must be conducted  by a psychiatrist,
a licensed psychologist  or a regulated social worker. If an evaluation is requested, the party at
whose request the evaluation was ordered shall notify the court and other parties of the date, time
and location of the evaluation and the  name of the evaluator chosen by the party. A party or the
court may submit written information to the evaluator for consideration.  When written information
that has not been  provided to the court or an opposing party is submitted to the evaluator, the party
submitting the written information to the evaluator shall provide the written information to the
court and the opposing party.
(2)(a) A county court or  justice court shall order the county to pay the fees and costs described
in subsection (3) of this section from funds available for that purpose.
(b) A circuit court shall order the executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission
to pay the fees and costs described in subsection (3) of this  section from funds available for that
purpose.
(3) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the county or the executive director  of the Oregon
Public Defense Commission shall pay:
(a) A reasonable fee to a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist or regulated social  worker in pri-
vate practice who conducts the evaluation; and
(b) All costs, including transportation of the youth, if the evaluation is conducted by a  psychi-
atrist, licensed psychologist or regulated social worker employed by the Department of Human Ser-
vices [ or is conducted by a community mental health  program or community developmental disabilities
program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.695 ].
(4) If an evaluation is ordered under ORS 419C.378, the county shall pay for the expense of  the
evaluation.
(5) After a motion  is made by the court or the youth under ORS 419C.378 (3), the state shall
have the right to seek an independent evaluation at its own expense.
(6) A youth may not be  removed from the youth’s current placement for the purpose of an
evaluation performed under this section unless :
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 7
(a) The youth has been placed in a detention  facility as defined in ORS 419A.004 or a youth
correction facility as defined in ORS 420.005 ; and
(b) The removal is for less than 14 days .
SECTION 10.  ORS 419C.392 is amended to read:
419C.392. (1) If the court finds that the youth is fit to proceed, the court shall  vacate the stay
under ORS 419C.378.
(2) If the court finds that the youth is unfit to  proceed and that there is not a substantial
probability that the youth will gain or regain fitness to proceed in the foreseeable  future if provided
restorative services under ORS 419C.396, the court shall:
(a) Immediately enter a judgment that dismisses the petition  alleging jurisdiction under ORS
419C.005 without prejudice; or
(b) If  necessary for planning or instituting an alternative proceeding, then not more than five
days after the findings are made enter a judgment that dismisses the petition without prejudice.
(3)(a) If the court finds that the youth is unfit to proceed and that there is a substantial proba-
bility that the youth will gain or regain fitness to proceed in the foreseeable future if  provided
restorative services under ORS 419C.396, the court shall continue the order under ORS 419C.378
staying the proceedings and order that the youth receive restorative services under ORS 419C.396.
(b) The court shall forward the order for restorative services to the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) Unless  otherwise specifically ordered, the court’s order for restorative services does
not commit the youth to the custody of the authority or alter the guardianship of the  youth.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 419C.396 is amended to read:
419C.396. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall arrange for the provision of or begin providing
restorative  services  within 30 days after receiving a court order under ORS 419C.392 (3). The au-
thority shall send a report to the court, with copies  to the parties to the proceeding initiated by a
petition alleging jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005, no later than 90 days after receipt of the order.
The report must describe  the nature and duration of restorative services provided, indicate whether
the youth is  fit to proceed or presents a substantial probability of gaining or regaining fitness to
proceed and recommend  whether restorative services should be continued and, if so, the type and
duration of the services.
(2) Within 14 days after receiving a report under subsection (1) of this section, the court  shall
determine the youth’s fitness to proceed and enter an order .
(3) Upon the recommendation of the authority, the request of a party or the court’s  own motion,
the court may hold a review hearing concerning the evaluation of the youth’s fitness  to proceed at
any time during which restorative services are provided pursuant to an order  under ORS 419C.392
(3). After a review hearing, the court shall determine the youth’s fitness to proceed.
(4) If  the court finds that a youth is fit to proceed, the court shall vacate the stay under ORS
419C.378.
(5) If the court finds that the youth remains  unfit to proceed and that there is not a substantial
probability that the youth will gain or regain fitness to proceed in  the foreseeable future, the court
shall:
(a) Immediately enter a judgment that dismisses the petition  alleging jurisdiction under ORS
419C.005 without prejudice; or
(b) If  necessary for planning or instituting an alternative proceeding, then not more than five
days after the findings are made enter a judgment that dismisses the petition without prejudice.
(6) If the court finds under subsection (2) or (3) of this section that the youth  remains unfit to
proceed, but that the youth presents a substantial probability  of gaining or regaining fitness to
proceed, the court shall order that restorative services  be continued. The court shall order the au-
thority to send a report to the court, with  copies to the parties, within a specified time, not to ex-
ceed 90 days from the time the order is filed.
(7) If the court finds under subsection (2) or  (3) of this section that a youth remains unfit to
proceed, the youth shall be discharged within a period of time that is reasonable for making a  de-
termination whether the  youth presents a substantial probability of gaining or regaining fitness to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 8
proceed. Regardless of the number of acts the petition alleging  jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005 al-
leges that the youth committed, the  youth may not be continued in restorative services for longer
than whichever of the following, measured from the date the petition is filed, is shorter:
(a) Three years; or
(b) The period of time  that is equal to the maximum commitment the court could have imposed
if the petition had been adjudicated.
(8)(a) If the court orders placement  for restorative services, the court may specify the type of
care, supervision, security or services to be provided by the authority to any youth placed  in the
custody of the Department of Human Services and to the parents or guardians of the youth.
(b) The authority, in coordination with the  Department of Human Services, the local juvenile
department and the youth’s family, may place the youth in  any facility authorized to accept the
youth and provide the necessary services and care that are most appropriate for the youth.
(c) The authority shall continue to provide restorative services wherever the youth is placed.
APPROPRIATIONS AND EXPENDITURE LIMITATIONS
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems  Division - Administration, is in-
creased by $314,619, for carrying out sections 1 to 8 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems  Division - Administration, is
increased by $314,619, for carrying out sections 1 to 8 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is in-
creased by $3,285, for carrying out sections 1 to 8 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 15.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $3,285, for carrying out sections 1 to 8 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $187,528 for carrying out the provisions of sections 3 to 5 this 2024 Act.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from federal funds, but
excluding federal funds not  described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the Department of Human Services, for  intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $187,528 for carrying  out the provisions of sections 3 to 5 this 2024
Act.
REPEALS
SECTION 18. Section 4 of this 2024 Act is repealed on July 2, 2026.
SECTION 19. Section 8 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 9
CAPTIONS
SECTION 20. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 21. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1557 (SB 1557-B) Page 10